New York, session 2025-2026, A4335.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. a. A task force, to be known as the task force on quantum 2 computing, is hereby established to study the creation of a quantum 3 computing project in this state. Such task force shall be comprised of 4 appropriate state agency personnel and experts in the field of quantum 5 computing. 6 b. The task force shall be comprised of: 7 (i) two members appointed by the governor; 8 (ii) two members appointed by the temporary president of the senate; 9 (iii) two members appointed by the speaker of the assembly; 10 (iv) one member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and 11 (v) one member appointed by the minority leader of the assembly. 12 c. The task force shall: 13 (i) examine and evaluate the development of quantum computing by 14 federal, state, and international governments and military agencies; and 15 (ii) make recommendations on how to utilize quantum computing for the 16 purposes of developing computers for civilian, business, trade, environ- 17 mental and security purposes, such as cryptanalysis, in this state. 18 d. Such task force shall submit a report, on or before January 1, 19 2026, to the governor and the legislature of its findings, conclusions 20 and recommendations, and legislative and regulatory proposals deemed 21 necessary to implement such recommendations. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05405-01-5